Hawaii statutes.
[§206E-196]
Assessment for operating costs.
(a) The authority shall have the power to assess all land users, except the
federal government, for their fair share of the costs required to administer
and operate the Kalaeloa community development district, which may include
costs associated with staffing. Assessments shall be based on each landowner's
proportionate share of the total acreage of the Kalaeloa community development
district.

(b) The
assessment shall be set by the authority annually, based upon the operating
budget for the district, and adjusted for any actual expenditures made in the
prior year in excess of the prior approved budget. The assessments shall be
paid to the authority in semiannual payments commencing thirty days after the
beginning of the fiscal year.

(c) The
authority may charge interest or other fees on assessment amounts not paid on a
timely basis, and may withhold services or approval of governmental permits for
land users delinquent in payments.

(d) For
the purposes of this section, "land user" includes the owner of land;
provided that the landowner may assign the responsibility for payment of
assessments to the lessee or licensee of the land. [L 2002, c 184, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next